incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="hemsko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="inste__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amanuens/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dora/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rane</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="guds/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ønene</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onen</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øner</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dr/ok__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ekene</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eker</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oka</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okene</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oker</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oki</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ok</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bom__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>men</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jamboree__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="førn/att__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atta</l>
          <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atti</l>
          <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>att</l>
          <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ettene</l>
          <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etter</l>
          <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="H__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>H</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gjørsl/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eene</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eer</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bygdenytt"><i>bygdenytt</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="innarste"><i>innarste</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amanuensis"><i>amanuens</i><par n="amanuens/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inste"><i>inste</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dotterson"><i>dotters</i><par n="guds/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drok"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andedam"><i>andedam</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inntrønder"><i>inntrønde</i><par n="dora/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrsteamanuensis"><i>fyrsteamanuens</i><par n="amanuens/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fråveringsdom"><i>fråveringsdom</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hudsko"><i>hudsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jamboree"><i>jamboree</i><par n="jamboree__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnesko"><i>barnesko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="førehandsdom"><i>førehandsdom</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husmannsson"><i>husmannss</i><par n="guds/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyllingsdam"><i>fyllingsdam</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hestesko"><i>hestesko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gentlemen's agreement"><i>gentlemen's agreement</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="da capo"><i>da capo</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gudson"><i>guds</i><par n="guds/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fosterson"><i>fosters</i><par n="guds/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bokflom"><i>bokflom</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gårnatt"><i>gårn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brudenatt"><i>bruden</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="close race"><i>close race</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beksaumsko"><i>beksaumsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hemsko"><i>hemsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heime"><i>heime</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doppsko"><i>doppsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="godvêrsnatt"><i>godvêrsn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inngåande"><i>inngåande</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bloddam"><i>bloddam</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bunadsko"><i>bunadsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frostnatt"><i>frostn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gummisko"><i>gummisko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="corps diplomatique"><i>corps diplomatique</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gom"><i>gom</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bandolærsko"><i>bandolærsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bunadssko"><i>bunadssko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fetlingsko"><i>fetlingsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brystkam"><i>brystkam</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gjørsle"><i>gjørsl</i><par n="gjørsl/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herresko"><i>herresko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hold up"><i>hold up</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredagsnatt"><i>fredagsn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høgstnatt"><i>høgstn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bakkekam"><i>bakkekam</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bynytt"><i>bynytt</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indre"><i>indre</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarnnatt"><i>jarnn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brurenatt"><i>bruren</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="corps de ballet"><i>corps de ballet</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bokskalvsko"><i>bokskalvsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gym"><i>gym</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dorar"><i>dora</i><par n="dora/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Austen"><i>Austen</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filtsko"><i>filtsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anglar"><i>angla</i><par n="dora/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="H"><i>H</i><par n="H__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkasum"><i>cirkasum</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haustnatt"><i>haustn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brorson"><i>brors</i><par n="guds/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jagarbom"><i>jagarbom</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fønikar"><i>fønika</i><par n="dora/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brurnatt"><i>brurn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="førnatt"><i>førn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baglar"><i>bagla</i><par n="dora/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bom"><i>bom</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gardmannsson"><i>gardmannss</i><par n="guds/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="førsteamanuensis"><i>førsteamanuens</i><par n="amanuens/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adoptivson"><i>adoptivs</i><par n="guds/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gullsko"><i>gullsko</i><par n="hemsko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bryllaupsnatt"><i>bryllaupsn</i><par n="førn/att__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gefundenes fressen"><i>gefundenes fressen</i><par n="inste__n"/></e>
    <e lm="godnattklem"><i>godnattklem</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
